Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-8803
Navigator; registration required;
prohibited acts.

(1)
No individual or entity shall perform, offer to perform, or advertise any
service as a navigator in this state unless registered as a navigator by the
director.

(2) A navigator
shall not:

(a) Engage in any activities that would require an insurance producer
license;

(b) Violate section 44-4050;

(c) Recommend or endorse a particular health
plan;

(d) Accept any compensation or consideration from an insurance company,
broker, or consultant that is dependent, in whole or in part, on whether a
person enrolls in or purchases a qualified health plan; or

(e) Fail to respond
to any written inquiry from the director regarding the navigator's duties
as a navigator or fail to request additional reasonable time to respond within
fifteen working days.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 3.
June 6, 2013